Maryland, session 2026, SB0934.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–303.
(M) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT:
(1) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, WITHIN THE DEBT
AFFORDABILITY GUIDELINES, THE STATE SHOULD PROVIDE AT LEAST $550,000,000
EACH YEAR FOR PUBLIC SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION IN ORDER TO MAINTAIN A
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0934*

SENATE BILL 934
RELATIVELY STABLE NUMBER OF FUNDED PROJECTS IN THE CAPITAL
IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM; AND
(2) THE ANNUAL GOAL ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION:
(I) SHOULD BE RECALCULATED BEFORE THE NANCY K. KOPP
PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITIES PRIORITY FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–326 OF
THIS SUBTITLE IS FUNDED; AND
(II) DOES NOT INCLUDE FUNDING PROVIDED FOR PUBLIC
SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION THROUGH THE BUILT TO LEARN PROGRAM.
Chapter 32 of the Acts of 2022, as amended by Chapter 354 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that:
(1) [beginning in fiscal year] FOR FISCAL YEARS 2023 THROUGH 2026,
within the current debt affordability guidelines, the State should provide at least
$450,000,000 each year for public school construction in order to maintain a relatively
stable number of funded projects in the Capital Improvement Program; and
(2) the annual goal established under item (1) of this section:
(i) should be recalculated prior to the Public School Facilities
Priority Fund being funded; and
(ii) does not include funding provided for public school construction
through the Built to Learn Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.